Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1126.
do enact as follows:SB1126,11Section 1. 104.001 of the statutes is repealed.SB1126,22Section 2. 104.01 (1g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1126,2,63104.01 (1g) “Consumer price index” means the average of the consumer price 4index over each 12-month period for all urban consumers, U.S. city average, all 5items, not seasonally adjusted, as determined by the bureau of labor statistics of the 6U.S. department of labor.SB1126,37Section 3. 104.01 (5g) of the statutes is repealed.SB1126,48Section 4. 104.01 (7m) of the statutes is repealed.SB1126,59Section 5. 104.035 of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB1126,2,1110104.035 Minimum wage; established. (1) Employees generally. Except 11as provided in subs. (2) and (3), the minimum wage is $15 per hour.SB1126,2,1312(2) Minimum wage established by department. The department shall 13promulgate rules establishing the minimum wage for all of the following:SB1126,3,11(a) Opportunity employees.SB1126,3,22(b) Agricultural employees.SB1126,3,33(c) Camp counselors.SB1126,3,44(d) Golf caddies.SB1126,3,65(e) Employees or workers with a disability covered under a license under s. 6104.07.SB1126,3,77(f) Student learners.SB1126,3,98(g) Students employed by an independent college or university for less than 20 9hours per week.SB1126,3,1210(3) Employment exempted by department. The department shall 11promulgate rules exempting from the minimum wage requirements under subs. (1) 12and (2) all of the following:SB1126,3,1413(a) A person engaged in casual employment in and around an employer’s 14home on an irregular or intermittent basis for not more than 15 hours per week.SB1126,3,1815(b) A person who resides in the home of an employer who, due to advanced age 16or physical or mental disability, cannot care for the employer’s own needs for the 17purpose of companionship and who spends not more than 15 hours per week on 18general household work for the employer.SB1126,3,2019(c) An elementary or secondary school student performing student work-like 20activities in the student’s school.SB1126,4,921(4) Department to revise. (a) Subject to par. (b), by the first day of the 12th 22month beginning after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], 23and annually thereafter, the department shall revise the minimum wage under sub. 1(1) by calculating the percentage difference between the consumer price index for 2the 12-month period ending on the last day of the last month for which that 3information is available and the consumer price index for the 12-month period 4ending on the last day of the month that is 12 months prior to that month, adjusting 5the minimum wage then in effect by that percentage difference, and rounding that 6result to the nearest multiple of 5 cents. The department shall annually send a 7notice of the revised amount to the legislative reference bureau for publication in 8the Wisconsin Administrative Register and shall annually publish the revised 9amount on the department’s website.SB1126,4,1310(b) Paragraph (a) does not apply if the consumer price index for the 12-month 11period ending on the last day of the last month for which that information is 12available has not increased over the consumer price index for the 12-month period 13ending on the last day of the month that is 12 months prior to that month.SB1126,4,1514(5) Gender-specific minimum wage prohibited. The department may not 15establish a different minimum wage for men and women.SB1126,616Section 6. 104.045 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1126,4,1717104.045 (title) Tips, meals, Meals, lodging, and hours worked.SB1126,718Section 7. 104.045 (1) of the statutes is repealed.SB1126,819Section 8. 227.01 (13) (Lw) of the statutes is created to read:SB1126,4,2020227.01 (13) (Lw) Adjusts the minimum wage under s. 104.035 (4).SB1126,921Section 9. Effective date.SB1126,5,21(1) Minimum wage. This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month 2beginning after publication.SB1126,5,33